Utah statutes.
54-17-502.   Renewable energy source -- Solicitation -- Consultant.
(1)  Sections 54-17-102 through 54-17-404 do not apply to a significant energy
resource that is a renewable energy source as defined in Section 54-17-601 if
the nameplate capacity of the renewable energy source does not exceed 300
megawatts or, if applicable, the quantity of capacity that is the subject of a
contract for the purchase of electricity from a renewable energy source does
not exceed 300 megawatts.
(2) (a) (i)  An affected electrical utility shall issue a public solicitation
of bids for a renewable energy source up to 300 megawatts in size by January
31 of each year in which it reasonably anticipates that it will need to
acquire or commence construction of a renewable energy resource.
(ii)  A solicitation for a renewable energy source issued by January 31, 2008
for up to 99 megawatts satisfies the requirement of this Subsection (2) for
the year 2008 if:
(A)  not later than 30 days after the day on which this section takes effect,
the affected electrical utility amends the solicitation or initiates a new
solicitation to seek bids for renewable energy source projects up to 300
megawatts in size; and
(B)  within 60 days after the day on which this section takes effect and as
soon as practicable, the commission retains a consultant in accordance with
Subsection (3).
(b)  A consultant hired under Subsection (2)(a)(ii)(B) shall perform the
consultant's duties under Subsection (3) in relation to the status of the
solicitation process at the time the consultant is retained and may not
unreasonably delay the solicitation process.
(c)  For a solicitation issued after January 31, 2008:
(i)  the affected electrical utility shall develop a reasonable process for
pre-approval of bidders; and
(ii)  in addition to publicly issuing the solicitation in Subsection
(2)(a)(i), the affected electrical utility shall send copies of the
solicitation to each potential bidder who is pre-approved.
(d)  The affected electrical utility shall evaluate in good faith each bid
that is received and negotiate in good faith with each bidder whose bid
appears to be cost effective, as defined in Section 54-17-602.
(e)  Beginning on August 1, 2008, and on each August 1 thereafter, the
affected electrical utility shall file a notice with the commission indicating
whether it reasonably anticipates that it will need to acquire or commence
construction of a renewable energy resource during the following year.
(3) (a)  If the commission receives a notice under Subsection (2)(e) that the
affected electrical utility reasonably anticipates that it will need to
acquire or commence construction of a renewable energy source during the
following year, the commission shall promptly retain a consultant to:
(i)  validate that the affected electrical utility is following the bidder
pre-approval process developed pursuant to Subsection (2)(c) and make
recommendations for changes to the pre-approval process for future
solicitations;
(ii)  monitor and document all material aspects of the bids, bid evaluations,
and bid negotiations between the affected electrical utility and any bidders
in the solicitation process;
(iii)  maintain adequate documentation of each bid, including the
solicitation, evaluation, and negotiation processes and the reason for the
conclusion of negotiations, which documentation shall be transmitted to the
commission at the conclusion of all negotiations in the solicitation; and
(iv)  be available to testify under oath before the commission in any relevant
proceeding concerning all aspects of the public solicitation process.
(b)  The commission and the consultant shall use all reasonable efforts to not
delay the solicitation process.
(4)  Documentation provided to the commission by the consultant shall be
available to the affected electrical utility, any bidder, or other interested
person under terms and conditions and at times determined appropriate by the
commission.
(5) (a)  The commission and the consultant shall execute a contract approved
by the commission with terms and conditions approved by the commission.
(b)  Unless otherwise provided by contract, an invoice for the consultant's
services shall be sent to the Division of Public Utilities for review and
approval.
(c)  After approval under Subsection (5)(b), the invoice shall be forwarded to
the affected electrical utility for payment to the consultant.
(d)  The affected electrical utility may, in a general rate case or other
appropriate commission proceeding, include, and the commission shall allow,
recovery by the affected electrical utility of any amount paid by the affected
electrical utility for the consultant.
(6) (a)  Nothing in this section precludes an affected electrical utility from
constructing or acquiring any renewable energy source project outside the
solicitation process provided for in this section, including purchasing
electricity from any renewable energy source project that chooses to self-
certify as a qualifying facility under the federal Public Utility Regulatory
Policies Act of 1978.
(b)  An affected electrical utility that constructs a renewable energy source
outside the solicitation process of this section or Section 54-17-201 shall
file a notice with the commission at least 60 days before the date of
commencement of construction, indicating the size and location of the
renewable energy source.
(c)  The date of commencement of construction under Subsection (6)(b) is the
date of any directive from an affected electrical utility to the person
responsible for the construction of the renewable energy source authorizing or
directing the person to proceed with construction.
(d)  For an affected electrical utility whose rates are regulated by the
commission, the utility has the burden of proving in a rate case or other
appropriate commission proceeding the prudence, reasonableness, and cost-
effectiveness of construction under this Subsection (6), including the method
used to evaluate the risks and value of any bid submitted in the solicitation
under this section.
(7)  Nothing in this section requires an affected electrical utility to enter
into any transaction that it reasonably believes is not cost effective or
otherwise is not in the public interest.
